Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.170

Purchase of animal, restrictions.

No law enforcement officer shall, directly or indirectly, purchase any animal sold under the provisions of this chapter, or any interest therein.

[ 1951 c 31 s 8. Formerly RCW 16.13.080.]